Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.315

Acquisition, construction, equipping and betterment of lands, buildings and facilities at universities and The Evergreen State College—Funding, refunding bonds.

Such boards of regents or trustees may from time to time provide for the issuance of funding or refunding revenue bonds to fund or refund at or prior to maturity any or all bonds of other indebtedness, including any premiums or penalties required to be paid to effect such funding or refunding, heretofore or hereafter issued or incurred to pay all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or installing any lands, buildings, or facilities of the nature described in RCW 28B.10.300.

Such funding or refunding bonds and any coupons attached thereto shall be negotiable instruments within the provisions and intent of the negotiable instruments law of this state.

Such funding or refunding bonds may be exchanged for or applied to the payment of the bonds or other indebtedness being funded or refunded or may be sold in such manner and at such price, and at such rate or rates of interest as the boards of regents or trustees deem advisable, either at public or private sale.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the maturities, terms, conditions, covenants, interest rate, issuance, and sale of revenue bonds shall be applicable to such funding or refunding bonds except as may be otherwise specifically provided in this section.

[ 1983 c 167 s 32; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 23; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 97; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.315. Prior: 1961 c 229 s 8. Formerly RCW 28.76.194.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.